New York, session 2025-2026, A11698.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 1 of section 413 of the social services law is 2 amended by adding a new paragraph (e) to read as follows: 3 (e) A social worker shall not be required to report cases of suspected 4 child abuse or maltreatment when such social worker is: 5 (i) employed or supervised by a lawyer who is providing representation 6 in a criminal or civil matter, including but not limited to a family law 7 or delinquency matter, and the basis for the belief of suspected child 8 abuse or maltreatment arises solely in the course of such represen- 9 tation; or 10 (ii) employed or supervised by a lawyer with whom a prospective client 11 is seeking representation in a criminal or civil matter, including but 12 not limited to a family law or delinquency matter, and the basis for the 13 belief of suspected child abuse or maltreatment arises solely in the 14 course of seeking such representation. 15 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD16273-01-6